District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-221.16

Dissolution — Actions pending not abated.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1319, ch. 854, § 783
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-221.16.
1981 Ed., § 29-416.
1973 Ed., § 29-716.